New Mexico, session 2026, SB198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of game and fish for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to design, plan and construct an aquatic endangered species hatchery and rearing station facility in Las Vegas. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233548.1